Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.130.040

Adoption of guidelines for establishing and funding transportation demand management programs.

The board of trustees or board of regents of each institution of higher education imposing a transportation fee shall adopt guidelines governing the establishment and funding of transportation demand management programs supported by transportation fees. These guidelines shall establish procedures for budgeting and expending transportation fee revenue.

[ 1993 c 447 s 5.]